District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.13

Duties and responsibilities of the SART.

The SART shall:

(1)

Improve the coordination and functioning of victim services, medical forensic care, investigations, and prosecutions available to victims of sexual assault;

(2)

Conduct regular case reviews, through the Case Review Subcommittee established by § 4-561.14, of all parties involved in sexual assault responses, including a review of sexual assault reports and investigations by the MPD and cases reported to any member of the SART; and

(3)

Develop a protocol to ensure that feedback and recommendations from the Case Review Subcommittee, established by § 4-561.14, are incorporated into SART member agencies’ policies, procedures, practices, training, and decisions to re-examine investigations, when applicable.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 213, 61 DCR 5913